Mississippi statutes. Title 21. Municipalities
Fire Districts

§ 21-25-21.
Creation.

The governing authorities of any municipality are hereby authorized to create, by ordinance, a fire district within or adjoining such municipality when petitioned so to do by a majority of the owners of property, either real or personal, located within such proposed fire district. After the creation of the fire district such governing authorities shall cause the ordinance creating such fire district to be published three weeks in some newspaper in such municipality, or the county in which the municipality is located, and at the next regular meeting of the governing authorities after such three weeks’ publication, they shall declare such territory to be a fire district as provided by this section. Such governing authorities shall have full power to contract for laying water mains and any other pipes or connections to the water mains to be used in said fire district, and for the establishment and maintenance of fire service therein.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1917, § 5896; 1930, § 2505; 1942, § 3614; Laws, 1914, ch. 172; Laws, 1920, ch. 318; Laws, 1950, ch. 498, § 1; Laws, 1968, ch. 556, §§ 1, 2, eff from and after passage (approved August 7, 1968).

§ 21-25-23.
Inclusion of state institution of higher learning.

The governing authorities of any municipality are hereby authorized, when petitioned so to do by the board of trustees of state institutions of higher learning, to create, by ordinance, a fire district encompassing the area adjoining such municipality on which a part or all of a state institution of higher learning is located, after the creation of which such governing authorities and the board of trustees of state institutions of higher learning shall have full power to contract for laying of water mains and any other pipes or connections to the water mains to be used in said fire district, and for the establishment and maintenance of fire service therein. However, no such governing authority shall have the power either to promulgate or enforce any charge, rule or regulation upon said district without first having received the ratification and consent of the board of trustees of state institutions of higher learning as reflected by the minutes of said trustees.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1917, § 5896; 1930, § 2505; 1942, § 3614; Laws, 1914, ch. 172; Laws, 1920, ch. 318; Laws, 1950, ch. 498, § 1; Laws, 1968, ch. 556, §§ 1, 2, eff from and after passage (approved August 7, 1968).

§ 21-25-25.
Consolidated fire districts.

The governing authorities of any two or more municipalities may, in their discretion, contract to create a consolidated fire district, which shall consist of the whole, or a part, of the territory of such municipalities joining therein. Such contract entered into by the governing authorities of such municipalities shall embrace all of the essential terms, and shall state the amount to be contributed by each participating municipality, and the control and operation of same. An ordinance containing the contract as to control of equipment, supervision of the district, and the amount of money to be contributed by each municipality, shall be passed by the governing authorities of all participating municipalities in the same form and substance. Such ordinance shall be duly published as now required by law, and shall go into effect unless twenty per cent of the qualified electors of one of the participating municipalities shall petition against same and file said petition with the proper clerk on or before the next regular meeting of said governing authorities, to be held not less than fifteen days thereafter. If such petition be duly filed, said governing authorities may either cancel said prior ordinance or order an election on said question. Said ordinance shall go into effect immediately if a majority of the qualified electors voting in said election vote therefor; otherwise, said ordinance shall remain void and of no effect, and no like ordinance shall be passed within four years thereafter.

Such consolidated fire district shall be given a name, and the supervision of protecting said district shall be vested in the governing authorities of the municipality decided upon and stated in the ordinance creating the consolidated fire district. The governing authorities of the municipalities in a consolidated fire district created under the provisions of this section shall have the same powers and duties as the governing authorities in any other fire district.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3614.5; Laws, 1948, ch. 389; Laws, 1950, ch. 498, § 2.

§ 21-25-27.
Levy by special assessment within district to pay for service.

The municipal governing authorities are vested with full power to raise the levy on the property, both personal and real, by special assessment within such fire district sufficient to pay for laying such water mains, and to meet the contracted annual rental for such service. Such authorities shall have all power to enforce and collect said taxes as provided by statutes empowering municipalities to collect special assessments, and it shall be done in the same general way and may be assessed at any time and cover such length of time as the governing authorities may deem proper.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1921 Supp. § 5896a; 1930, § 2506; 1942, § 3615; Laws, 1920, ch. 318; Laws, 1950, ch. 498, § 3.

§ 21-25-29.
Extension of service; abandonment.

The said governing authorities shall have power to declare an extension of such service to any adjacent territory, within or adjoining such municipality, upon petition of a majority of the property owners in such proposed added territory. In like manner, upon petition of a majority of the property owners residing therein, such fire districts may be abandoned and discontinued by the governing authorities of the municipalities involved.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1921 Supp. § 5896b; 1930, § 2507; 1942, § 3616; Laws, 1920, ch. 318; Laws, 1950, ch. 498, § 4.

§ 21-25-31.
Acquisition of plant and equipment.

Any municipality authorized to establish a fire district may purchase or construct any waterworks plant or other plant or equipment necessary for the establishment or maintenance of fire service in such fire district. Such municipality may issue the bonds of such fire district, as now provided by law, for the purpose of securing funds to be used for the purchase or construction of such plant. Such municipality may pay or retire such bonds from taxes annually levied on the taxable property of such district, as provided for in Section 21-25-27.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1921 Supp. § 5896c; 1930, § 2508; 1942, § 3617; Laws, 1920, ch. 318; Laws, 1950, ch. 498, § 5.